Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1784.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3108(k) of Title 63 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 3108. Civil penalties.* * *(i.1) Frivolous complaints.--(1) The commissioner may impose a civil penalty on a person who files a frivolous complaint against a licensee. The amount of the civil penalty under this subsection shall be established by regulation of the commissioner and shall not exceed $1,000 per violation.(2) Prior to the imposition of a civil penalty under this subsection, the commissioner shall provide notice to the complainant and afford the complainant an opportunity to 12345678910111213141516171819 respond in accordance with 2 Pa.C.S. (relating to administrative law and procedure).(3) All proceedings to impose a civil penalty under this subsection shall be conducted in accordance with section 3105 and any applicable regulations of the commissioner.* * *(k) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Frivolous complaint." A complaint that is groundless and brought in bad faith or is groundless and brought for the purpose of harassment, annoyance or to gain a competitive advantage."Unlicensed practice." Any of the following:(1) Practicing a profession or occupation or operating a business for which a license, registration, certificate or permit is required without holding a valid, unexpired, unrevoked or unsuspended authority to do so.(2) Representing to the public or a person, through offerings, advertisements or the use of a title, that the individual is qualified to practice a profession, occupation or business for which a license, registration, certificate or permit is required without holding a valid, unexpired, unrevoked or unsuspended authority to do so.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1784PN2195 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425